Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2413
Association; director; examine; regulate; financial report; furnish.

The association shall be subject to examination and regulation by the director. Any such examination conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be paid for by the association. The board of directors shall submit to the director, not later than March 30 of each year, a financial report for the preceding calendar year in a form approved by the director.

Laws 1971, LB 722, § 13.